Washington statutes.
RCW 11.86.071

Liability for distribution—Effect of disclaimer.

No legal representative of a creator of the interest, holder of legal title to property an interest in which is disclaimed, or person having possession of the property shall be liable for any otherwise proper distribution or other disposition made without actual knowledge of the disclaimer, or in reliance upon the disclaimer and without actual knowledge that the disclaimer is barred as provided in RCW 11.86.051.

[ 1989 c 34 s 7.]